src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The UNDEFINED language nouns inflect in cases.

LEXICON noun
+N: # ;
LEXICON noun_dem
+N: # ;
LEXICON noun_dem.mon
+N: # ;
LEXICON noun_deskr
+N: # ;
LEXICON noun_koll
+N: # ;
LEXICON noun_komp
+N: # ;
LEXICON noun_mod
+N: # ;
LEXICON noun_mon
+N: # ;
LEXICON noun_mon.vaill
+N: # ;
LEXICON noun_sup
+N: # ;
LEXICON noun_taipum
+N: # ;
LEXICON noun_vaill
+N: # ;


LEXICON noun_sg_nom
+Sg+Nom:0 # ;

LEXICON noun_sg_common
+Sg+Gen:n # ;
+Sg+Ess:n{aä} # ;
+Sg+Tra:kši # ;
+Sg+Ine:šš{aä} # ;
+Sg+Ela:št{aä} # ;
+Sg+Ill:h # ;
+Sg+Ade:ll{aä} # ;
+Sg+All:ll{aä} # ;
+Sg+Abl:lt{aä} # ;
+Sg+Abe:tt{aä} # ;
+Pl+Nom:t # ;

LEXICON noun_sg_par
+Sg+Par:{aä} # ;

LEXICON noun_pl_common
+Pl+Gen:jen # ;
+Pl+Par:j{aä} # ;
+Pl+Ess:in{aä} # ;
+Pl+Tra:iksi # ;
+Pl+Ine:iss{aä} # ;
+Pl+Ela:ist{aä}  # ;
+Pl+Ill:ih # ;
+Pl+Ade:ill{aä} # ;
+Pl+All:ill{aä} # ;
+Pl+Abl:ilt{aä} # ;
+Pl+Abe:itt{aä} # ;
+Pl+Com:ineh # ;
+Pl+Ins:in # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
