src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
akanaine	noun_dem ;
akkašikko	noun_koll ;
akkula	noun ;
alahaisies	noun_koll ;
alahisto	noun_koll ;
aporkka	noun ;
appiehut	noun_dem ;
arokko	noun_koll ;
assunta	noun ;
aukkoine	noun_dem ;
avosuonet	noun_mon ;
ellohko	noun_mod ;
elämine	noun ;
etonaine	noun_dem ;
eänetys	noun ;
haiputti	noun_deskr ;
hakas	noun ;
hankoine	noun_dem ;
hapinat	noun_mon ;
haravoimine	noun ;
harjakkaiset	noun_mon ;
harjieset	noun_mon ;
hasero	noun_deskr ;
hautaine	noun_dem ;
hautajaiset	noun_mon ;
hautomine	noun ;
hauvahko	noun_mod ;
heimoveh	noun_koll ;
heinoveh	noun_koll ;
heinöveh	noun_koll ;
hellissyntä	noun ;
helväine	noun_dem ;
herralisto	noun_koll ;
herraveh	noun_koll ;
herroveh	noun_koll ;
herruitšenta	noun ;
hetvelöine	noun_dem ;
heähkö	noun_mod ;
heäjöveh	noun_koll ;
hiilosta	noun ;
himoine	noun_dem ;
hirahus	noun ;
hoavalmo	noun ;
hohlit	noun_mon ;
hojakattava	noun_mod ;
honkahaine	noun_dem ;
hoorat	noun_mon ;
horoma	noun ;
huitakeh	noun ;
hurku	noun ;
hussuine	noun_dem ;
hut́kat	noun_mon ;
hämyine	noun_dem ;
hätkehkö	noun_mod ;
hätkempäine	noun_komp ;
hätkettšäine	noun_mod ;
hätä(v)ytäntä	noun ;
höikäleh	noun_deskr ;
höipelö	noun_deskr ;
höytelöine	noun_dem ;
ikriššät	noun_mon ;
ispotnii	noun ;
isäine	noun_dem ;
jakajaiset	noun_mon ;
jokos	noun ;
joutoine	noun_dem ;
juustuine	noun_dem ;
jäkelikkö	noun ;
jälettšimet	noun_mon ;
jälkiset	noun_mon ;
kainaloine	noun_dem ;
kalajas	noun_koll ;
kalipat	noun_mon ;
kaltehet	noun_mon ;
kaĺuškaine	noun_dem ;
kamfari	noun ;
kamukset	noun_mon ;
kanarjalisto	noun_koll ;
kansoveh	noun_koll ;
kantomut	noun_dem ;
kapissekset	noun_mon ;
kartikka	noun ;
karttamukset	noun_mon ;
karvaine	noun_dem ;
kastiettšaine	noun_mod ;
kasvatekset	noun_mon ;
kataloašat	noun_mon ;
katšalkat	noun_mon ;
kaunikkine	noun_dem ;
keleveršiekka	noun ;
kellottimet	noun_mon ;
keppine	noun_dem ;
kerittšemet	noun_mon ;
kesreäntähine	noun_mon ;
keyhälistö	noun_koll ;
kiehakkoine	noun_dem ;
kiimuitšus	noun ;
kiisseline	noun_dem ;
kirikköveh	noun_koll ;
kirnujaiset	noun_mon ;
kissaine	noun_dem ;
kiulu	noun ;
kĺunkkaine	noun_dem ;
koalikset	noun_mon ;
koatieset	noun_dem.mon ;
koavaiset	noun_mon ;
kohtalisto	noun_koll ;
kohtoveh	noun_koll ;
koipe	noun ;
koiralisto	noun_koll ;
koĺenaine	noun_dem ;
kolmieset	noun_mon ;
kolmoveh	noun_koll ;
kopiene	noun_dem ;
kopla	noun ;
korvaine	noun_dem ;
kosat	noun_mon ;
kostieset	noun_mon ;
kotos	noun ;
kottaine	noun_dem ;
krintšat	noun_mon ;
krukovoi	noun ;
kukkoine	noun_dem ;
kulvahisto	noun ;
kunnahikko	noun_koll ;
kunttimuntit	noun_mon ;
kuomakset	noun_mon ;
kupehtoine	noun_dem ;
kuptšalisto	noun_koll ;
kurpit	noun_mon.vaill ;
kuršut	noun_mon.vaill ;
kusijaine	noun ;
kut́mulisto	noun_koll ;
kuutamaine	noun_dem ;
kuvoamaiset	noun_mon ;
kylähkö	noun_mod ;
kyläjäs	noun_koll ;
kylöveh	noun_koll ;
kynseäntä	noun ;
kälykset	noun_mon ;
käńäine	noun_dem ;
kätkijäiset	noun_mon ;
könkäs	noun ;
körkköi	noun_deskr ;
laipoit	noun_mon ;
lakkaine	noun_dem ;
laksies	noun_koll ;
laskomet	noun_mon ;
latteus	noun ;
laulajaine	noun_dem ;
lehikkö	noun_koll ;
lehvomaiset	noun_mon ;
leipoveh	noun_koll ;
lentieset	noun_mon ;
lieto	noun ;
lievemmys	noun_komp ;
lihaine	noun_dem ;
liijahko	noun_mod ;
liijattava	noun_mod ;
liikkoveh	noun_koll ;
linjoarit	noun_mon ;
linnalisto	noun_koll ;
linnoveh	noun_koll ;
loarine	noun_dem ;
lohja	noun ;
lohkoveh	noun_koll ;
lujat	noun_mon ;
lujemmus	noun_komp ;
luokoveh	noun_koll ;
luota	noun ;
ĺuuĺuine	noun_dem ;
lähimys	noun_sup ;
länket	noun_mon ;
löpö(i)	noun ;
mammeroine	noun_dem ;
manteristo	noun_koll ;
marukset	noun_mon ;
matkoveh	noun_koll ;
meholaine	noun ;
miehistö	noun_koll ;
mielyt	noun_dem ;
moskoukka	noun ;
multieset	noun_mon ;
munittajaine	noun_dem ;
munttiset	noun_dem.mon ;
mutšurkka	noun ;
muuttieset	noun_mon ;
mäkeveh	noun_koll ;
mäkilistö	noun_koll ;
mömmeröine	noun_dem ;
möykättšy	noun_mod ;
möyry	noun ;
narota	noun_koll ;
ńaukkoi	noun_vaill ;
neittšyine	noun_dem ;
neljöveh	noun_koll ;
neveskäkset	noun_mon ;
nieloitin	noun ;
niittoveh	noun_koll ;
nipurittša	noun_vaill ;
nirsat	noun_mon ;
nošnittšemet	noun_mon ;
nossilnitšat	noun_mon ;
nousentšat	noun_mon ;
ńouskuine	noun_dem ;
nuora	noun ;
nuorilisto	noun_koll ;
nuoriso	noun_koll ;
nuottaveh	noun_koll ;
nuottoveh	noun_koll ;
nälempäine	noun_komp ;
nälähkö	noun_mod ;
nälättävä	noun_mod ;
näpläkkäine	noun_mod ;
näššine	noun_dem ;
nätšky	noun_vaill ;
oasat	noun_mon ;
oivennus	noun ;
omalisto	noun_koll ;
omenut	noun_dem ;
ostaukka	noun ;
ostoaiset	noun_mon ;
oturkka	noun_vaill ;
otus	noun_vaill ;
outoi	noun_dem ;
pahalisto	noun_koll ;
pahnoveh	noun_koll ;
paimoveh	noun_koll ;
pajarilisto	noun_koll ;
palalaikka	noun ;
palloine	noun_dem ;
panijaiset	noun_mon ;
pappilisto	noun_koll ;
paskannus	noun ;
passipoine	noun_dem ;
peretniekkaine	noun_dem ;
peŕoka	noun ;
peroveh	noun_koll ;
persokset	noun_mon ;
pesus	noun_koll ;
peäläiset	noun_dem.mon ;
peälät	noun_mon ;
peäsköine	noun_dem ;
pihĺai	noun ;
pihoveh	noun_koll ;
pihtimyöt	noun_dem.mon ;
pihtyöt	noun_dem.mon ;
pilkkine	noun_dem ;
pitoi	noun ;
platenttšaine	noun_dem ;
poarakset	noun_mon ;
poarišńa	noun ;
poataroine	noun_dem ;
pohatisto	noun_koll ;
pohattalisto	noun_koll ;
pohattola	noun_koll ;
pohjasies	noun_koll ;
poikoveh	noun_koll ;
pokossisto	noun_koll ;
pokostoveh	noun_koll ;
poojesta	noun ;
popuine	noun_dem ;
portahuot	noun_dem.mon ;
potsat	noun_mon ;
potvota	noun ;
pratanakset	noun_mon ;
prihalisto	noun_koll ;
priukat	noun_mon ;
prokkoĺa	noun ;
promuslaine	noun_dem ;
puhtiet	noun_mon ;
pulikka	noun ;
pulpanaine	noun_dem ;
purlakisto	noun_koll ;
puroine	noun_dem ;
purossekset	noun_mon ;
puto(v)us	noun ;
pyyhyt	noun_dem ;
pyytöveh	noun_koll ;
pätinöveh	noun_koll ;
pöhö	noun ;
pöksyiset	noun_dem.mon ;
pölyine	noun_dem ;
raja(h)iset	noun_mon ;
rasseli	noun ;
rattahaine	noun_dem ;
repoveh	noun_koll ;
riepuine	noun_dem ;
rihvikkö	noun ;
ristieset	noun_mon ;
roatoveh	noun_koll ;
roavassunta	noun ;
ropoi	noun_dem ;
roti(i)teĺat	noun_mon ;
rotńalisto	noun_koll ;
rotńoveh	noun_koll ;
rotoveh	noun_koll ;
rouvalisto	noun_koll ;
ruis	noun ;
rupuine	noun_dem ;
räiskeh	noun ;
röpöiset	noun_dem.mon ;
šaha	noun_vaill ;
šaikkoveh	noun_koll ;
sajoveh	noun_koll ;
šalkku	noun ;
šalkkuine	noun_dem ;
šamkki	noun_taipum ;
sarajas	noun_koll ;
šaravoarat	noun_mon ;
sarjoveh	noun_koll ;
savuonta	noun ;
šeikkoveh	noun_koll ;
seipo(i)	noun_dem ;
selkoveh	noun_koll ;
senttšaiset	noun_dem.mon ;
sevoittarekset	noun_mon ;
seäköiseätšinä	noun_vaill ;
šielo	noun_vaill ;
siiksa	noun ;
siivuojaine	noun_dem ;
sisärintämäkset	noun_mon ;
skoaskaine	noun_dem ;
školaniekka	noun ;
snimsat	noun_mon ;
šnipukka	noun_vaill ;
soakorta	noun ;
soarukka	noun_dem ;
śoloveh	noun_koll ;
sorokuška	noun ;
spitška	noun_dem ;
sreäppieset	noun_mon ;
štaniset	noun_dem.mon ;
štanit	noun_mon ;
stiiru	noun ;
stunai	noun_vaill ;
suitšet	noun_mon ;
sulaine	noun_dem ;
sulikki	noun_vaill ;
survos	noun ;
svajakakset	noun_mon ;
svajoveh	noun_koll ;
svitiläine	noun_dem ;
svoatpoveh	noun_koll ;
svätkat	noun_mon ;
säilymine	noun ;
takoveh	noun_koll ;
talleroine	noun_dem ;
tarttelus	noun ;
t́ašat	noun_mon ;
tenninvoi	noun_vaill ;
teätälistö	noun_koll ;
tilkaine	noun_dem ;
tillites	noun ;
touko	noun ;
trepentšät	noun_mon ;
trutšmaine	noun_dem ;
truukukset	noun_mon ;
tšiekso	noun ;
tšipuine	noun_dem ;
tširpikkähät	noun_mon ;
tšuhmu	noun ;
tšukunaine	noun_dem ;
tulemikko	noun_koll ;
tulieset	noun_mon ;
tultavaine	noun_dem ;
tunnos	noun ;
tutukkaine	noun_dem ;
typpö	noun ;
tyrššyiset	noun_dem.mon ;
tyttölistö	noun_koll ;
töhyrit	noun_mon ;
töppähyine	noun_dem ;
uhtujas	noun_koll ;
ulineh	noun ;
ussaiset	noun_dem.mon ;
utaret	noun_mon ;
uutaine	noun_dem ;
vainoa	noun ;
varattšimet	noun_mon ;
vasaine	noun_dem ;
vasikka	noun ;
veikokset	noun_mon ;
velattava	noun_mod ;
venttšajaiset	noun_mon ;
vetelijäine	noun_dem ;
vetämäine	noun ;
viltiet	noun_mon ;
virkeh	noun ;
virkkuine	noun_dem ;
virssattšu	noun_mod ;
voitiene	noun_dem ;
vonkarvies	noun_koll ;
votńa	noun ;
vuotieset	noun_mon ;
äimä	noun ;
